Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.375

Merger—Plan—Approval.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, approval of a plan of merger by a domestic partnership party to the merger shall occur when the plan is approved by all of the partners.

(2) If a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, the plan of merger shall be adopted and approved as provided in RCW 25.10.781.

(3) If a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, the plan of merger shall be adopted and approved as provided in RCW 25.15.421.

(4) If a domestic corporation is a party to the merger, the plan of merger shall be adopted and approved as provided in *chapter 23B.11 RCW.

[ 2015 c 188 s 113; 2009 c 188 s 1406; 1998 c 103 s 906.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 23B.11 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 22 s 13. For later enactment, see chapter 23B.11A RCW.

Effective date—2015 c 188: See RCW 25.15.903.

Effective date—2009 c 188: See note following RCW 23B.13.020.